Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-110
Departments; officers; oath.

Each head of a department, deputy, and assistant shall, before entering upon the duties of his office, subscribe and take the constitutional oath of office, which shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 9, p. 438;

C.S.1922, § 7250;

C.S.1929, § 81-112;

R.S.1943, § 81-110.

For a form of oath, see Article XV, section 1, Constitution of Nebraska, and sections 11-101 and 11-101.01.

Head of department herein referred to represents exactly the same head of executive department referred to in the Constitution. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).